Washington statutes.
RCW 43.380.060

Council reimbursement.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5139-S.SL) ***

The members of the council shall serve without compensation, but are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2016 c 188 s 7.]